Utah statutes.
41-1a-118.   Seizure of documents and plates -- Grounds -- Receipt.

(1)  The division and peace officers may take possession of any certificate of title, registration card, registration decal, permit, license  plate, or any other article issued by the division:

(a)  upon expiration, suspension, revocation, alteration, or cancellation of it;

(b)  that is fictitious;

(c)  that has been unlawfully or erroneously issued; or

(d)  that is unlawfully or erroneously displayed.

(2)  A receipt shall be issued for any confiscated item.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 1, 1992 General Session

